Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 32 Advance Directives for Health Care

Cross references.

Georgia Caregivers Act, §

31-36B-1

et seq.

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation, T. 31, C. 39.

Psychiatric advance directives, §

37-11-1

et seq.

Impact of anatomical gift on an advance directive for health care, §

44-5-159

.

Editor’s notes.

Chapter 32 was added to Title 31 by both Ga. L. 1984, p. 1477, § 1, and by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1. The former was set out as former Chapter 32 and the latter was redesignated as Chapter 33 by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24, effective July 1, 2007, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and at Chapter 36 of this title and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 31-32-1 through 31-32-12, relating to living wills, and was based on Ga. L. 1984, p. 1477, § 1 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 445, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 322, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1182, § 1, 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1926, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 31.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn. In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The ‘Right to Die’ in Georgia,” see 20 Ga. St. B. J. 68 (1983).

For article, “The Georgia Living Will,” see 21 Ga. St. B. J. 15 (1984).

For article, “An Overview of Georgia’s Living Will Legislation,” see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 45 (1984).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 375 (1984).

For note, “Amendments to the Living Will Statute: Two Down and One to Go,” see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 99 (1987).

For note, “Incubating for the State: The Precarious Autonomy of Persistently Vegetative and Brain-Dead Pregnant Women,” 22 Ga. L. Rev. 1103 (1988).

For comment, “The Expense of Expanding the Right to Die: A Trilogy,” see 5 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 117 (1988).

For article, “Right to Die Legislation: The Effect on Physicians’ Liability,” see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 517 (1988).

For note, “Determining Patient Competency in Treatment Refusal Cases,” see 24 Ga. L. Rev. 733 (1990).

For comment, “Living Will Statutes in Light of Cruzan v. Director, Missouri Department of Health: Ensuring that a Patient’s Wishes Will Prevail,” see 40 Emory L.J. 1305 (1991).

For article, “Experimenting with the ‘Right to Die’ in the Laboratory of the States,” see 25 Ga. L. Rev. 1253 (1991).

For article, “If Nancy Cruzan Had Lived in Georgia:
A Summary of Georgia Law Regarding the Right to Die,” see 27 Ga. St. B. J. 194 (1991).

For article, “Medical Decision-Making in Georgia,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (2005).

For article, “Are There Checks and Balances on Terminating the Lives of Children with Disabilities? Should There Be?,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 959 (2009).

For article, “Exploring the Right to Die in the U.S.,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1021 (2017).

For article, “Unbefriended and Unrepresented:
Better Medical Decision Making for Incapacitated Patients Without Healthcare Surrogates,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 923 (2017).

For article, “Ending-Life Decisions:
Some Disability Perspectives,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 893 (2017).

For article, “Distinctive Factors Affecting the Legal Context of End-Of-Life Medical Care for Older Persons,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 869 (2017).

For note, “Let Your Conscience Be Your Guide:
Comparing and Contrasting Washington’s Death with Dignity Act and Pharmacy Regulations After the Ninth Circuit’s Decision in Stormans, Inc. v. Wiesman,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 613 (2018).

For article, “Bioethics:
Ethical Considerations of Ventilator Triage During a Pandemic: Formulation and Implementation of Ventilator Triage and Other Scarce Resource Allocation Guidelines for Use During COVID-19,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 173 (2020).

31-32-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Advance Directive for Health Care Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For note, “An Advance Directive: The Elective, Effective Way to be Protective of Your Rights,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 521 (2017).

31-32-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Advance directive for health care” means a written document voluntarily executed by a declarant in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 31-32-5.

“Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility at the time of reference for the treatment and care of the declarant.

“Declarant” means a person who has executed an advance directive for health care authorized by this chapter.

“Durable power of attorney for health care” means a written document voluntarily executed by an individual creating a health care agency in accordance with Chapter 36 of this title, as such chapter existed on and before June 30, 2007.

“Health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat, or provide for a declarant’s physical or mental health or personal care.

“Health care agent” means a person appointed by a declarant to act for and on behalf of the declarant to make decisions related to consent, refusal, or withdrawal of any type of health care and decisions related to autopsy, anatomical gifts, and final disposition of a declarant’s body when a declarant is unable or chooses not to make health care decisions for himself or herself. The term “health care agent” shall include any back-up or successor agent appointed by the declarant.

“Health care facility” means a hospital, skilled nursing facility, hospice, institution, home, residential or nursing facility, treatment facility, and any other facility or service which has a valid permit or provisional permit issued under Chapter 7 of this title or which is licensed, accredited, or approved under the laws of any state, and includes hospitals operated by the United States government or by any state or subdivision thereof.

“Health care provider” means the attending physician and any other person administering health care to the declarant at the time of reference who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or the practice of a profession, including any person employed by or acting for any such authorized person.

“Life-sustaining procedures” means medications, machines, or other medical procedures or interventions which, when applied to a declarant in a terminal condition or in a state of permanent unconsciousness, could in reasonable medical judgment keep the declarant alive but cannot cure the declarant and where, in the judgment of the attending physician and a second physician, death will occur without such procedures or interventions. The term “life-sustaining procedures” shall not include the provision of nourishment or hydration but a declarant may direct the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration in an advance directive for health care. The term “life-sustaining procedures” shall not include the administration of medication to alleviate pain or the performance of any medical procedure deemed necessary to alleviate pain.

“Living will” means a written document voluntarily executed by an individual directing the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures when an individual is in a terminal condition, coma, or persistent vegetative state in accordance with this chapter, as such chapter existed on and before June 30, 2007.

(10.1)

“Mental health care” shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 37-11-3.

(10.2)

“Mental health care agent” means an agent appointed under a psychiatric advance directive in accordance with Chapter 11 of Title 37.

“Physician” means a person lawfully licensed in this state to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43; and if the declarant is receiving health care in another state, a person lawfully licensed in such state.

“Provision of nourishment or hydration” means the provision of nutrition or fluids by tube or other medical means.

(12.1)

“Psychiatric advance directive” means a written document voluntarily executed by an individual in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-11-9.

“State of permanent unconsciousness” means an incurable or irreversible condition in which the declarant is not aware of himself or herself or his or her environment and in which the declarant is showing no behavioral response to his or her environment.

“Terminal condition” means an incurable or irreversible condition which would result in the declarant’s death in a relatively short period of time.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-11/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraphs (10.1), (10.2), and (12.1).

Law reviews.

For note, “An Advance Directive: The Elective, Effective Way to be Protective of Your Rights,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 521 (2017).

31-32-3.
Savings clause for existing living wills and durable powers of attorney for health care.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to, affect, or invalidate a living will or durable power of attorney for health care executed prior to July 1, 2007, to which the provisions of former Chapter 32 or Chapter 36 of this title shall continue to apply, nor shall it affect any claim, right, or remedy that accrued prior to July 1, 2007.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

31-32-4.
Form.

“GEORGIA ADVANCE DIRECTIVE FOR HEALTH CARE By: Date of Birth: (Print Name) (Month/Day/ Year) This advance directive for health care has four parts: PART ONE HEALTH CARE AGENT. This part allows you to choose someone to make health care decisions for you when you cannot (or do not want to) make health care decisions for yourself. The person you choose is called a health care agent. You may also have your health care agent make decisions for you after your death with respect to an autopsy, organ donation, body donation, and final disposition of your body. You should talk to your health care agent about this important role. PART TWO TREATMENT PREFERENCES. This part allows you to state your treatment preferences if you have a terminal condition or if you are in a state of permanent unconsciousness. PART TWO will become effective only if you are unable to communicate your treatment preferences. Reasonable and appropriate efforts will be made to communicate with you about your treatment preferences before PART TWO becomes effective. You should talk to your family and others close to you about your treatment preferences. PART THREE GUARDIANSHIP. This part allows you to nominate a person to be your guardian should one ever be needed. PART FOUR EFFECTIVENESS AND SIGNATURES. This part requires your signature and the signatures of two witnesses. You must complete PART FOUR if you have filled out any other part of this form. You may fill out any or all of the first three parts listed above. You must fill out PART FOUR of this form in order for this form to be effective. You should give a copy of this completed form to people who might need it, such as your health care agent, your family, and your physician. Keep a copy of this completed form at home in a place where it can easily be found if it is needed. Review this completed form periodically to make sure it still reflects your preferences. If your preferences change, complete a new advance directive for health care. Using this form of advance directive for health care is completely optional. Other forms of advance directives for health care may be used in Georgia. You may revoke this completed form at any time. This completed form will replace any advance directive for health care, durable power of attorney for health care, health care proxy, or living will that you have completed before completing this form. PART ONE: HEALTH CARE AGENT [PART ONE will be effective even if PART TWO is not completed. A physician or health care provider who is directly involved in your health care may not serve as your health care agent. If you are married, a future divorce or annulment of your marriage will revoke the selection of your current spouse as your health care agent. If you are not married, a future marriage will revoke the selection of your health care agent unless the person you selected as your health care agent is your new spouse.] (1) Health Care Agent I select the following person as my health care agent to make health care decisions for me: Name: Address: Telephone Numbers: (Home, Work, and Mobile) (2) Back-up Health Care Agent [This section is optional. PART ONE will be effective even if this section is left blank.] If my health care agent cannot be contacted in a reasonable time period and cannot be located with reasonable efforts or for any reason my health care agent is unavailable or unable or unwilling to act as my health care agent, then I select the following, each to act successively in the order named, as my back-up health care agent(s): Name: Address: Telephone Numbers: (Home, Work, and Mobile) Name: Address: Telephone Numbers: (Home, Work, and Mobile) (3)
General Powers of Health Care Agent My health care agent will make health care decisions for me when I am unable to communicate my health care decisions or I choose to have my health care agent communicate my health care decisions. My health care agent will have the same authority to make any health care decision that I could make. My health care agent’s authority includes, for example, the power to: • Admit me to or discharge me from any hospital, skilled nursing facility, hospice, or other health care facility or service; • Request, consent to, withhold, or withdraw any type of health care; and • Contract for any health care facility or service for me, and to obligate me to pay for these services (and my health care agent will not be financially liable for any services or care contracted for me or on my behalf). My health care agent will be my personal representative for all purposes of federal or state law related to privacy of medical records (including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996) and will have the same access to my medical records that I have and can disclose the contents of my medical records to others for my ongoing health care. My health care agent may accompany me in an ambulance or air ambulance if in the opinion of the ambulance personnel protocol permits a passenger, and my health care agent may visit or consult with me in person while I am in a hospital, skilled nursing facility, hospice, or other health care facility or service if its protocol permits visitation. My health care agent may present a copy of this advance directive for health care in lieu of the original and the copy will have the same meaning and effect as the original. I understand that under Georgia law: • My health care agent may refuse to act as my health care agent; • A court can take away the powers of my health care agent if it finds that my health care agent is not acting properly; • My health care agent does not have the power to make health care decisions for me regarding sterilization, involuntary hospitalization, or involuntary treatment for mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease; and • My health care agent does not have the power to make health care decisions that are otherwise covered under a psychiatric advance directive that I have executed pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including decisions related to treatment or hospitalization for mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease. (4) Guidance for Health Care Agent When making health care decisions for me, my health care agent should think about what action would be consistent with past conversations we have had, my treatment preferences as expressed in PART TWO (if I have filled out PART TWO), my religious and other beliefs and values, and how I have handled medical and other important issues in the past. If what I would decide is still unclear, then my health care agent should make decisions for me that my health care agent believes are in my best interest, considering the benefits, burdens, and risks of my current circumstances and treatment options. (5)
Powers of Health Care Agent After Death (A) Autopsy My health care agent will have the power to authorize an autopsy of my body unless I have limited my health care agent’s power by initialing below. (Initials) My health care agent will not have the power to authorize an autopsy of my body (unless an autopsy is required by law). (B) Organ Donation and Donation of Body My health care agent will have the power to make a disposition of any part or all of my body for medical purposes pursuant to the Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, unless I have limited my health care agent’s power by initialing below. [Initial each statement that you want to apply.] (Initials) My health care agent will not have the power to make a disposition of my body for use in a medical study program. (Initials) My health care agent will not have the power to donate any of my organs. (C) Final Disposition of Body My health care agent will have the power to make decisions about the final disposition of my body unless I have initialed below. (Initials) I want the following person to make decisions about the final disposition of my body: Name: Address: Telephone Numbers: (Home, Work, and Mobile) I wish for my body to be: (Initials) Buried OR (Initials) Cremated PART TWO: TREATMENT PREFERENCES [PART TWO will be effective only if you are unable to communicate your treatment preferences after reasonable and appropriate efforts have been made to communicate with you about your treatment preferences. PART TWO will be effective even if PART ONE is not completed. If you have not selected a health care agent in PART ONE, or if your health care agent is not available, then PART TWO will provide your physician and other health care providers with your treatment preferences. If you have selected a health care agent in PART ONE, then your health care agent will have the authority to make all health care decisions for you regarding matters covered by PART TWO. Your health care agent will be guided by your treatment preferences and other factors described in Section (4) of PART ONE.] (6)
Conditions PART TWO will be effective if I am in any of the following conditions: [Initial each condition in which you want PART TWO to be effective.] (Initials) A terminal condition, which means I have an incurable or irreversible condition that will result in my death in a relatively short period of time. (Initials) A state of permanent unconsciousness, which means I am in an incurable or irreversible condition in which I am not aware of myself or my environment and I show no behavioral response to my environment. My condition will be determined in writing after personal examination by my attending physician and a second physician in accordance with currently accepted medical standards. (7) Treatment Preferences [State your treatment preference by initialing (A), (B), or (C). If you choose (C), state your additional treatment preferences by initialing one or more of the statements following (C). You may provide additional instructions about your treatment preferences in the next section. You will be provided with comfort care, including pain relief, but you may also want to state your specific preferences regarding pain relief in the next section.] If I am in any condition that I initialed in Section (6) above and I can no longer communicate my treatment preferences after reasonable and appropriate efforts have been made to communicate with me about my treatment preferences, then: (A)
(Initials) Try to extend my life for as long as possible, using all medications, machines, or other medical procedures that in reasonable medical judgment could keep me alive. If I am unable to take nutrition or fluids by mouth, then I want to receive nutrition or fluids by tube or other medical means. OR (B)
(Initials) Allow my natural death to occur. I do not want any medications, machines, or other medical procedures that in reasonable medical judgment could keep me alive but cannot cure me. I do not want to receive nutrition or fluids by tube or other medical means except as needed to provide pain medication. OR (C)
(Initials) I do not want any medications, machines, or other medical procedures that in reasonable medical judgment could keep me alive but cannot cure me, except as follows: [Initial each statement that you want to apply to option (C).] (Initials) If I am unable to take nutrition by mouth, I want to receive nutrition by tube or other medical means. (Initials) If I am unable to take fluids by mouth, I want to receive fluids by tube or other medical means. (Initials) If I need assistance to breathe, I want to have a ventilator used. (Initials) If my heart or pulse has stopped, I want to have cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) used. (8) Additional Statements [This section is optional. PART TWO will be effective even if this section is left blank. This section allows you to state additional treatment preferences, to provide additional guidance to your health care agent (if you have selected a health care agent in PART ONE), or to provide information about your personal and religious values about your medical treatment. For example, you may want to state your treatment preferences regarding medications to fight infection, surgery, amputation, blood transfusion, or kidney dialysis. Understanding that you cannot foresee everything that could happen to you after you can no longer communicate your treatment preferences, you may want to provide guidance to your health care agent (if you have selected a health care agent in PART ONE) about following your treatment preferences. You may want to state your specific preferences regarding pain relief.] (9)
In Case of Pregnancy [PART TWO will be effective even if this section is left blank.] I understand that under Georgia law, PART TWO generally will have no force and effect if I am pregnant unless the fetus is not viable and I indicate by initialing below that I want PART TWO to be carried out. (Initials) I want PART TWO to be carried out if my fetus is not viable. PART THREE: GUARDIANSHIP (10)
Guardianship [PART THREE is optional. This advance directive for health care will be effective even if PART THREE is left blank. If you wish to nominate a person to be your guardian in the event a court decides that a guardian should be appointed, complete PART THREE. A court will appoint a guardian for you if the court finds that you are not able to make significant responsible decisions for yourself regarding your personal support, safety, or welfare. A court will appoint the person nominated by you if the court finds that the appointment will serve your best interest and welfare. If you have selected a health care agent in PART ONE, you may (but are not required to) nominate the same person to be your guardian. If your health care agent and guardian are not the same person, your health care agent will have priority over your guardian in making your health care decisions, unless a court determines otherwise.] [State your preference by initialing (A) or (B). Choose (A) only if you have also completed PART ONE.] (A) (Initials) I nominate the person serving as my health care agent under PART ONE to serve as my guardian. OR (B) (Initials) I nominate the following person to serve as my guardian: Name: Address: Telephone Numbers: (Home, Work, and Mobile) PART FOUR: EFFECTIVENESS AND SIGNATURES This advance directive for health care will become effective only if I am unable or choose not to make or communicate my own health care decisions. This form revokes any advance directive for health care, durable power of attorney for health care, health care proxy, or living will that I have completed before this date. Unless I have initialed below and have provided alternative future dates or events, this advance directive for health care will become effective at the time I sign it and will remain effective until my death (and after my death to the extent authorized in Section (5) of PART ONE). (Initials) This advance directive for health care will become effective on or upon and will terminate on or upon . [You must sign and date or acknowledge signing and dating this form in the presence of two witnesses. Both witnesses must be of sound mind and must be at least 18 years of age, but the witnesses do not have to be together or present with you when you sign this form. A witness: • Cannot be a person who was selected to be your health care agent or back-up health care agent in PART ONE; • Cannot be a person who will knowingly inherit anything from you or otherwise knowingly gain a financial benefit from your death; or • Cannot be a person who is directly involved in your health care. Only one of the witnesses may be an employee, agent, or medical staff member of the hospital, skilled nursing facility, hospice, or other health care facility in which you are receiving health care (but this witness cannot be directly involved in your health care).] By signing below, I state that I am emotionally and mentally capable of making this advance directive for health care and that I understand its purpose and effect. (Signature of Declarant) (Date) The declarant signed this form in my presence or acknowledged signing this form to me. Based upon my personal observation, the declarant appeared to be emotionally and mentally capable of making this advance directive for health care and signed this form willingly and voluntarily. (Signature of First Witness) (Date) Print Name: Address: (Signature of Second Witness) (Date) Print Name: Address: ” [This form does not need to be notarized.]

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 4/SB 405; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2022, p. HB 752, § 2-12/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (3) of PART ONE of the form, inserted a comma following “passenger” in the fourth paragraph, and in the sixth paragraph, substituted “sterilization, involuntary hospitalization, or involuntary treatment” for “psychosurgery, sterilization, or treatment or involuntary hospitalization” in the third bullet and added the fourth bullet.

Cross references.

Standby Guardianship Act, §

29-2-9

et seq.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For article, “Three General Principles of Good Drafting,” see 16 (No. 2) Ga. St. B. J. 62 (2010).

31-32-5.
Execution; use of form or other forms; witnesses; copies; amendment.

Any person of sound mind who is emancipated or 18 years of age or older may execute a document which:

Appoints a health care agent;

Directs the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration when the declarant is in a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness; or

Covers matters contained in both paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.

Such document shall be in writing, signed by the declarant or by some other person in the declarant’s presence and at the declarant’s express direction, and witnessed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section.

When a document substantially complying with Code Section 31-32-4 is executed in accordance with this Code section, it shall be treated as an advance directive for health care which complies with this Code section. No provision of this chapter shall be construed to bar a declarant from using any other form of advance directive for health care which complies with this Code section. A document covering any matter contained in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section which was executed in another state and is valid under the laws of the state where executed shall be treated as an advance directive for health care which complies with this Code section.

An advance directive for health care shall be attested and subscribed in the presence of the declarant by two witnesses who are of sound mind and at least 18 years of age, but such witnesses do not have to be together or present when the declarant signs the advance directive for health care.

Neither witness can be a person who:

Was selected to serve as the declarant’s health care agent;

Will knowingly inherit anything from the declarant or otherwise knowingly gain a financial benefit from the declarant’s death; or

Is directly involved in the declarant’s health care.

Not more than one of the witnesses may be an employee, agent, or medical staff member of the health care facility in which the declarant is receiving health care.

A physician or health care provider who is directly involved in the declarant’s health care may not serve as the declarant’s health care agent.

A copy of an advance directive for health care executed in accordance with this Code section shall be valid and have the same meaning and effect as the original document.

An advance directive for health care may be amended at any time by a written document signed by the declarant or by some other person in the declarant’s presence and at the declarant’s express direction, and witnessed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.09.20.01.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

31-32-6.
Revocation; declarant’s marriage or appointment of a guardian.

An advance directive for health care may be revoked at any time by the declarant, without regard to the declarant’s mental state or competency, by any of the following methods:

By completing a new advance directive for health care that has provisions which are inconsistent with the provisions of a previously executed advance directive for health care, living will, or durable power of attorney for health care; provided, however, that such revocation shall extend only so far as the inconsistency exists between the documents and any part of a prior document that is not inconsistent with a subsequent document shall remain unrevoked;

By being obliterated, burned, torn, or otherwise destroyed by the declarant or by some person in the declarant’s presence and at the declarant’s direction indicating an intention to revoke;

By a written revocation clearly expressing the intent of the declarant to revoke the advance directive for health care signed and dated by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s direction. If the declarant is receiving health care in a health care facility, revocation of an advance directive for health care will become effective only upon communication to the attending physician by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s direction. The attending physician shall record in the declarant’s medical record the time and date when the attending physician received notification of the written revocation; or

By an oral or any other clear expression of the intent to revoke the advance directive for health care in the presence of a witness 18 years of age or older who, within 30 days of the expression of such intent, signs and dates a writing confirming that such expression of intent was made. If the declarant is receiving health care in a health care facility, revocation of an advance directive for health care will become effective only upon communication to the attending physician by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s direction. The attending physician shall record in the declarant’s medical record the time, date, and place of the revocation and the time, date, and place, if different, when the attending physician received notification of the revocation. Any person, other than the health care agent, to whom an oral or other nonwritten revocation of an advance directive for health care is communicated or delivered shall make all reasonable efforts to inform the health care agent of that fact as promptly as possible.

Unless an advance directive for health care expressly provides otherwise, if after executing an advance directive for health care, the declarant marries, such marriage shall revoke the designation of a person other than the declarant’s spouse as the declarant’s health care agent, and if, after executing an advance directive for health care, the declarant’s marriage is dissolved or annulled, such dissolution or annulment shall revoke the designation of the declarant’s former spouse as the declarant’s health care agent.

An advance directive for health care which survives disability, incapacity, or incompetency shall not be revoked solely by the appointment of a guardian or receiver for the declarant. Absent an order of the probate court or superior court having jurisdiction directing a guardian of the person to exercise the powers of the declarant under an advance directive for health care which survives disability, incapacity, or incompetency, the guardian of the person has no power, duty, or liability with respect to any health care matters covered by the advance directive for health care; provided, however, that no order usurping the authority of a health care agent known to the proposed guardian shall be entered unless notice is sent by first-class mail to the health care agent’s last known address and it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the health care agent is acting in a manner inconsistent with the power of attorney.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).